Tennessee, session 114, HB1134.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-353, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c) A disabled veteran must provide documentation of the veteran's service and
disability to be eligible for the exemption under this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1134
002538
- 1 -